Utah statutes.
76-6-1001.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Key" means any instrument used by the postal service and postal
customer, and which is designed to operate the lock on a mail receptacle.
(2)  "Mail" means any letter, card, parcel, or other material, along with its
contents, that:
(a)  has postage affixed by the postal customer or postal service;
(b)  has been accepted for delivery by the postal service;
(c)  the postal customer leaves for collection by the postal service; or
(d)  the postal service delivers to the postal customer.
(3)  "Mail receptacle" means a mail box, post office box, rural box, or any
place intended or used by postal customers or the postal service for the
collection or delivery of mail.
(4)  "Postage" means a postal service stamp, permit imprint, meter strip, or
other indication of either prepayment for postal service provided or
authorization by the postal service for collection and delivery of mail.
(5)  "Postal service" means the United States Postal Service and any motor
carrier engaged in the business of collecting, transporting, and delivering
mail.
